Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5327.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) As the state board of education reviews potential changes to graduation requirements, the board shall, at minimum, include in its recommendations adjustments necessary to ensure that students have adequate opportunity to demonstrate competency of the foundational skills established in the high school computer science state learning standards and state financial education learning standards.(2) In developing the recommendations, the state board of education must:(a) Consult with students, parents and legal guardians, educators, K-12 education partners, postsecondary partners, employers, and community members; and(b) Consider how to incorporate the competencies described in subsection (1) of this section into the framework of graduation requirements, including consideration of credit options and competency-based options.(3) The state board of education shall, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, report its recommendations to the governor and the education committees of the legislature by December 31, 2026.(4) This section expires August 1, 2027.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. (1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall initiate a review and update of the state computer science learning standards for students in grades kindergarten through 12. In developing the update of the state computer science learning standards, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall review computer science learning standards adopted by other states and consult with nonprofit organizations that have a demonstrated expertise in assisting states in developing computer science learning standards. In developing the state learning standards and supporting documents for grades nine through 12, the office of the superintendent of public instruction must identify any standards considered to be foundational for graduation purposes as established in section 1 of this act.(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall initiate a review of the state financial education learning standards adopted under authority of RCW 28A.300.469 and identify any standards considered to be foundational for graduation purposes as established in section 1 of this act.(3) The state board of education shall collect information from school districts about the courses and other learning opportunities currently offered in computer science and financial education for high school students in their district, how the district already assesses or plans to assess competency of the computer science or financial education state learning standards, and what the district may need to implement the state board of education's recommendations established under section 1 of this act. The data collection required by this subsection may be conducted concurrently with other oversight and monitoring activities conducted by the state board of education. The state board of education shall report a summary of the information collected to the legislature by December 31, 2026, and shall include any recommendations on what actions the legislature could take to assist school districts in meeting the needs identified by school districts, including whether exploring options for increasing the number of educators endorsed to teach computer science is necessary.(4) This section expires August 1, 2027.Sec. 3. RCW 28A.300.468 and 2015 c 211 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) After consulting with the financial education public-private partnership, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall make available to all school districts a list of instructional materials that align with the state financial education learning standards ((integrated into the state learning standards pursuant to RCW 28A.300.460(2)(d)))adopted in RCW 28A.300.469.(2) School districts shall provide all students in grades nine through ((twelve))12 the opportunity to access the financial education learning standards, whether through a regularly scheduled class period; before or after school; during lunch periods; at library and study time; at home; via online learning opportunities; through career and technical education course equivalencies; or other opportunities. School districts shall publicize the availability of financial education opportunities to students and their families. School districts are encouraged to grant credit toward high school graduation to students who successfully complete financial education courses.Sec. 4. RCW 28A.655.070 and 2024 c 157 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop state learning standards that identify the knowledge and skills all public school students need to know and be able to do based on the student learning goals in RCW 28A.150.210, develop student assessments, and implement the accountability recommendations and requests regarding assistance, rewards, and recognition of the state board of education.(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall:(a) Periodically revise the state learning standards, as needed, based on the student learning goals in RCW 28A.150.210. Goals one and two shall be considered primary. To the maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall integrate goals three and four ((and the knowledge and skill areas in the other goals in))into the state learning standards;(b) Include a screening for biased content in each development or revision of a state learning standard and ensure that the concepts of diversity, equity, and inclusion, as those terms are defined in RCW 28A.415.443, are incorporated into each new or revised state learning standard. In meeting the requirements of this subsection (2)(b), the superintendent of public instruction shall consult with the applicable commissions established in Title 43 RCW and other persons and organizations with relevant expertise; and(c) Review and prioritize the state learning standards and identify, with clear and concise descriptions, the grade level content expectations to be assessed on the statewide student assessment and used for state or federal accountability purposes. The review, prioritization, and identification shall result in more focus and targeting with an emphasis on depth over breadth in the number of grade level content expectations assessed at each grade level. Grade level content expectations shall be articulated over the grades as a sequence of expectations and performances that are logical, build with increasing depth after foundational knowledge and skills are acquired, and reflect, where appropriate, the sequential nature of the discipline. The office of the superintendent of public instruction, within seven working days, shall post on its website any grade level content expectations provided to an assessment vendor for use in constructing the statewide student assessment.(3)(a) In consultation with the state board of education, the superintendent of public instruction shall maintain and continue to develop and revise a statewide academic assessment system in the content areas of reading, writing, mathematics, and science for use in the elementary, middle, and high school years designed to determine if each student has mastered the state learning standards identified in subsection (1) of this section. School districts shall administer the assessments under guidelines adopted by the superintendent of public instruction. The academic assessment system may include a variety of assessment methods, including criterion-referenced and performance-based measures.(b) Effective with the 2009 administration of the Washington assessment of student learning and continuing with the statewide student assessment, the superintendent shall redesign the assessment in the content areas of reading, mathematics, and science in all grades except high school by shortening test administration and reducing the number of short answer and extended response questions.(c) By the 2014-15 school year, the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the state board of education, shall modify the statewide student assessment system to transition to assessments developed with a multistate consortium, as provided in this subsection:(i) The assessments developed with a multistate consortium to assess student proficiency in English language arts and mathematics shall be administered beginning in the 2014-15 school year, and beginning with the graduating class of 2020, the assessments must be administered to students in the tenth grade. The reading and writing assessments shall not be administered by the superintendent of public instruction or schools after the 2013-14 school year.(ii) The high school assessments in English language arts and mathematics in (c)(i) of this subsection shall be used for the purposes of federal and state accountability and for assessing student career and college readiness.(d) The statewide academic assessment system must also include the Washington access to instruction and measurement assessment for students with significant cognitive challenges.(4) If the superintendent proposes any modification to the state learning standards or the statewide assessments, then the superintendent shall, upon request, provide opportunities for the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate to review the assessments and proposed modifications to the state learning standards before the modifications are adopted.(5) The assessment system shall be designed so that the results under the assessment system are used by educators as tools to evaluate instructional practices, and to initiate appropriate educational support for students who have not mastered the state learning standards at the appropriate periods in the student's educational development.(6) By September 2007, the results for reading and mathematics shall be reported in a format that will allow parents and teachers to determine the academic gain a student has acquired in those content areas from one school year to the next.(7) To assist parents and teachers in their efforts to provide educational support to individual students, the superintendent of public instruction shall provide as much individual student performance information as possible within the constraints of the assessment system's item bank. The superintendent shall also provide to school districts:(a) Information on classroom-based and other assessments that may provide additional achievement information for individual students; and(b) A collection of diagnostic tools that educators may use to evaluate the academic status of individual students. The tools shall be designed to be inexpensive, easily administered, and quickly and easily scored, with results provided in a format that may be easily shared with parents and students.(8) To the maximum extent possible, the superintendent shall integrate knowledge and skill areas in development of the assessments.(9) Assessments for goals three and four of RCW 28A.150.210 shall be integrated in the state learning standards and assessments for goals one and two.(10) The superintendent shall develop assessments that are directly related to the state learning standards, and are not biased toward persons with different learning styles, racial or ethnic backgrounds, or on the basis of gender.(11) The superintendent shall review available and appropriate options for competency-based assessments that meet the state learning standards. In accordance with the review required by this subsection, the superintendent shall provide a report and recommendations to the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate by November 1, 2019.(12) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the unique needs of special education students when developing the assessments under this section.(13) The superintendent shall consider methods to address the unique needs of highly capable students when developing the assessments under this section.(14) The superintendent shall post on the superintendent's website lists of resources and model assessments in social studies, the arts, and health and fitness.(15) The superintendent shall integrate financial education skills and content knowledge into the state learning standards pursuant to RCW 28A.300.460(2)(d).(16)(a) The superintendent shall notify the state board of education in writing before initiating the development or revision of the state learning standards under subsections (1) and (2) of this section. The notification must be provided to the state board of education in advance for review at a regularly scheduled or special board meeting and must include the following information:(i) The subject matter of the state learning standards;(ii) The reason or reasons the superintendent is initiating the development or revision; and(iii) The process and timeline that the superintendent intends to follow for the development or revision.(b) The state board of education may provide a response to the superintendent's notification for consideration in the development or revision process in (a) of this subsection.(c) Prior to adoption by the superintendent of any new or revised state learning standards, the superintendent shall submit the proposed new or revised state learning standards to the state board of education in advance in writing for review at a regularly scheduled or special board meeting. The state board of education may provide a response to the superintendent's proposal for consideration prior to final adoption.(17) The state board of education may propose new or revised state learning standards to the superintendent. The superintendent must respond to the state board of education's proposal in writing.(18) The superintendent shall produce and post on its website a schedule for the revision of state learning standards under subsection (2) of this section by September 1, 2025. In addition to notifying parents, schools, and the public of the revision schedules and timelines, the website posting must be updated as necessary to inform persons of the status of any pending revisions, and of any plans or actions related to developing new state learning standards under subsection (1) of this section.--- END ---